Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to  the Employment Relations Board, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,386,733.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $275,642
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in section 3 of this 2023  Act,
collected or received by the Employment Relations Board.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,408,177 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from moneys received from the assessment against state agencies de-
scribed in ORS 240.167 and transferred to the Employment Relations  Board Administrative
Account.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 17, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 2